Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-115.01
Employee; extend coverage; when.

Sections 48-115, 48-115.01, and 48-146 shall be so construed as to effectuate their general purpose to extend workers' compensation coverage to additional employees and officers as soon as the same may be done under the Constitution of Nebraska.

Laws 1967, c. 291, § 3, p. 796;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 34.